Arkansas, session 2025, HB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-80-120(a), concerning the signature
authority for advanced practice registered nurses and physician assistants,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) When a provision of law or rule requires a signature,
certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or endorsement by a physician,
the requirement may be fulfilled by an advanced practice registered nurse or
a physician assistant in any of the following circumstances:
(1) Certification of disability for patients to receive disabled
parking permits or placards from the Office of Motor Vehicle; or
(2) Signature for:
(A) Sports physicals to authorize student athletes to
participate in athletic activities;
*JMB035*
03-18-2025 14:04:29 JMB035

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1167
(B) Physicals for bus drivers;
(C) Forms relating to do-not-resuscitate orders;
(D) Forms excusing a potential jury member due to an
illness;
(E) Death certificates;
(F) Workers' compensation forms;
(G) Forms relating to absenteeism for employment or school
purposes; or
(H) Authorizations for durable medical equipment,
including without limitation orthotics, prosethetics, and diabetic shoes or
shoe inserts that are designed to reduce the risk of skin breakdown in
patients with diabetes and existing foot disease and to relieve pressure to
prevent diabetic foot ulcers.

/s/L. Johnson





















03-18-2025 14:04:29 JMB035